Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0610

Remuneration of directors.

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, the board of directors may set the remuneration of directors and of nondirector committee members appointed under RCW 23.100.0617(1).

[ 2019 c 37 s 610.]